Utah statutes.
16-6a-1610.   Scope of a member's right to inspect or receive copies.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this part, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, a right of a member to inspect or receive information from a nonprofit corporation that is created by this part applies only to a voting member of the nonprofit corporation.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 2002 General Session

